Massachusetts, session 194th, H3630.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 90B, Section 20 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end of the following section. ''Recreation vehicle'' or ''off-highway vehicle'', any
motor vehicle designed or modified for use over unimproved terrain for recreation or pleasure
while not being operated on a public way as defined in chapter 90 including, but not limited to,
all-terrain vehicles, off-highway motorcycles, dirt bikes, recreation utility vehicles and all
registered motor vehicles while not being operated on a public way as defined in said chapter 90;
provided, however, that recreation vehicles and off-highway vehicles operated exclusively for
agricultural, forestry, lumbering or construction purposes shall not be subject to this chapter and
it shall be an affirmative defense that such vehicle was being operated for such purposes at the
time of an alleged violation of this chapter. :- “Any motor vehicle legally registered under
of 2

chapter 90 will not be subject to registration (dual registration) under this chapter but registration
numbers shall be displayed as required by said chapter 90.
SECTION 2. 1st paragraph of Section 22 of chapter 90B of the General Laws is hereby
amended by striking the words “Provided, however, that the director may exempt a participant of
a sanctioned race, rally or event who is not a resident of the commonwealth from the
requirements of this section.”
And inserting the following words:- “All participants of a sanctioned race, rally or event
that is sanctioned by a bonafide state, regional, national or international sanctioning body shall
be exempt from the requirements of this section.”
Chapter 90B, Section 22 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
of the 1st paragraph:- “Any motor vehicle legally registered under Chapter 90 will not be subject
to registration under this chapter but registration numbers shall be displayed as required by said
Chapter 90.”
SECTION 3. Section 21 of said chapter 90B, is hereby amended by
striking the words “The director may exempt a participant of a sanctioned race, rally or
event who is not a resident of the Commonwealth from the requirements of this section.”
And inserting the following words:- “All participants of a sanctioned race, rally or event
that is sanctioned by a bonafide state, regional, national or international sanctioning body shall
be exempt from the requirements of this section
of 2